Washington statutes.
RCW 1.08.015

Codification and revision of laws—Scope of revision.

Subject to such general policies as may be promulgated by the committee and to the general supervision of the committee, the reviser shall:

(1) Codify for consolidation into the Revised Code of Washington all laws of a general and permanent nature heretofore or hereafter enacted by the legislature, and assign permanent numbers as provided by law to all new titles, chapters, and sections so added to the revised code.

(2) Edit and revise such laws for such consolidation, to the extent deemed necessary or desirable by the reviser and without changing the meaning of any such law, in the following respects only:

(a) Make capitalization uniform with that followed generally in the revised code.

(b) Make chapter or section division and subdivision designations uniform with that followed in the revised code.

(c) Substitute for the term "this act," where necessary, the term "section," "part," "code," "chapter," or "title," or reference to specific section or chapter numbers, as the case may require.

(d) Substitute for reference to a section of an "act," the proper code section number reference.

(e) Substitute for "as provided in the preceding section" and other phrases of similar import, the proper code section number references.

(f) Substitute the proper calendar date for "effective date of this act," "date of passage of this act," and other phrases of similar import.

(g) Strike out figures where merely a repetition of written words, and substitute, where deemed advisable for uniformity, written words for figures.

(h) Rearrange any misplaced statutory material, incorporate any omitted statutory material as well as correct manifest errors in spelling, and manifest clerical or typographical errors, or errors by way of additions or omissions.

(i) Correct manifest errors in references, by chapter or section number, to other laws.

(j) Correct manifest errors or omissions in numbering or renumbering sections of the revised code.

(k) Rearrange the order of sections to conform to such logical arrangement of subject matter as may most generally be followed in the revised code, and alphabetize definition sections, when to do so will not change the meaning or effect of such sections.

(l) Change the wording of section captions, if any, and provide captions to new chapters and sections.

(m) Strike provisions manifestly obsolete.

(3) Create new code titles, chapters, and sections of the Revised Code of Washington, or otherwise revise the title, chapter and sectional organization of the code, all as may be required from time to time, to effectuate the orderly and logical arrangement of the statutes. Such new titles, chapters, and sections, and organizational revisions, shall have the same force and effect as the ninety-one titles originally enacted and designated as the "Revised Code of Washington" pursuant to the code adoption acts codified in chapter 1.04 RCW.

[ 2009 c 186 s 1; (2011 c 74 s 801 repealed by 2012 c 214 s 1601); 1961 c 246 s 1; 1953 c 257 s 4; 1951 c 157 s 7.]

NOTES:

Application—Effective date—2011 c 74: See notes following RCW 62A.9A-102.